Hawaii statutes.
[§94-1.2] The state archivist.
The department of accounting and general services shall fulfill its
responsibilities for the public archives through the state archivist. The
state archivist shall:

(1) Administer the state archives, records
management, and digital archives programs and facilities;

(2) Advise and assist state agencies in the
preparation of retention and disposition schedules for government records; and
provide records management training and technical assistance services to
agencies;

(3) Issue guidelines and standards, including those
applicable to computer hardware and software, for the preservation of
government records maintained by state recordkeeping systems, including digital
imaging processes for scanning of records and technology for creating and
storing electronic records;

(4) Adopt rules as may be necessary to effectuate the
responsibilities established under paragraph (1), and for the acquisition,
maintenance, access, and preservation of government records, as well as the use
of records or other materials, in the custody of the state archives; and

(5) Request and obtain an electronic copy of any
government record of enduring value currently in digital format for the digital
archives to ensure the long-term preservation of the record. [L 2013, c 88, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next